Alabama, session 2026rs, HB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 31-10-2, 31-10-3, and 31-10-4, Code
15 of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
16 "§31-10-2
17 The following words used in this article have the
18 following meanings:
19 (1) ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE BENEFITS. Additional funds for
20 guard members who are enrolled undergraduate students who
21 graduated from high school with a cumulative GPA greater than
22 3.5 and, while enrolled in an institution of higher education
23 in this state, have maintained a 3.0 collegiate cumulative
24 GPA. These funds may be used for tuition, fees, or ancillary
25 costs.
26 (2)(1) ACTIVE MEMBER. A member of a federally
27 recognized unit of the Alabama National Guard meeting the
28 minimum requirements for satisfactory membership as defined in
Page 1

minimum requirements for satisfactory membership as defined in
HB233 Enrolled
29 the Department of the Army and Department of the Air Force
30 regulations.
31 (3)(2) ALABAMA NATIONAL GUARD. Federally recognized
32 units of the Alabama National Guard.
33 (4)(3) ANCILLARY COSTS. Expenses incurred outside of
34 tuition related to educational costs, including textbooks,
35 additional course fees, differential tuition, or other course
36 relatedcourse-related or training program costs.
37 (4) EDUCATIONAL EXPENSES. The per term cost of required
38 on-campus living expenses, such as the cost of living in a
39 residence hall or dormitory, and per term cost of required
40 on-campus meal plans.
41 (5) DIFFERENTIAL TUITION. The amount, in addition to
42 regular tuition, which is charged to students to support
43 services and programming at institutions of higher education.
44 (6) INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. A public or
45 private two-year or four-year college or university, community
46 college, or junior college located within the state.
47 (5)(7) QUALIFYING ACADEMIC PATHWAY. A postsecondary
48 program at an institution of higher education in the state
49 that is one of the following:
50 a. A program that has been identified as a Pell Grant
51 eligible program for which the student earns credits required
52 for a postsecondary degree at the undergraduate level.
53 b. A graduate program that is the individual's first
54 degree sought at that level.
55 c. A workforce development program.
56 (6)(8) TUITION. The per term cost of instruction and
Page 2

(6)(8) TUITION. The per term cost of instruction and
HB233 Enrolled
57 mandatory instructional fees to the public or private
58 postsecondary student not to exceed the median cost of tuition
59 per term, such as quarter or semester, of all public four-year
60 institutions of higher education in this state as reported to
61 the Alabama Commission on Higher Education by state-supported
62 institutions of higher education and appearing on the tuition
63 plus required fees report of the commission, for classes or
64 courses that count towardstoward the individual's degree or
65 certificate plan as designed and approved by the college or
66 institution attended for the individual's declared program of
67 study. Differential tuition is not included.
68 (9) WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM. A professional or
69 workforce development program that includes accredited and
70 nonaccredited certification or stand-alone training that leads
71 to an industry-recognized credential and is approved pursuant
72 to Section 31-10-3(c)."
73 "§31-10-3
74 (a) Subject to the annual appropriation to the Alabama
75 National Guard Educational Assistance Program in the annual
76 Education Trust Fund Appropriation Act, provided the annual
77 appropriations shall not exceed ten million dollars
78 ($10,000,000), the Alabama Commission on Higher Education may
79 pay or reimburse the qualifying tuition for any active member
80 of the Alabama National Guard who is one of the following:
81 (1) A student dually or concurrently enrolled in high
82 school and an institution of higher education.
83 (2) A postsecondary student who is enrolled in an
84 institution of higher education.
Page 3

institution of higher education.
HB233 Enrolled
85 (3) A postsecondary student who is dually or
86 concurrently enrolled in more than one institution of higher
87 education and is enrolled in a program leading to a qualifying
88 academic pathway, including a short certificate or long
89 certificate, orworkforce development program, associate
90 degree, baccalaureatebachelor's degree, mastersmaster's
91 degree, or doctorate degree in an accredited institution of
92 higher learning, including a community or technical college or
93 an approved nonaccredited course or certificate program within
94 this state.
95 (b) The annual appropriation to the National Guard
96 Educational Assistance Program shall not exceed ten million
97 dollars ($10,000,000).
98 (c)(1) The Adjutant General and the Executive Director
99 of the Alabama Commission on Higher Education shall mutually
100 determine to which workforce development programs tuition
101 assistance may be applied. Any entity program seeking to be a
102 workforce development program shall be registered as a vendor
103 with this state.
104 (2) The Adjutant General and the Executive Director of
105 the Alabama Commission on Higher Education shall mutually
106 determine how assistance may be applied to each workforce
107 development program.
108 (b)(d)(1) The payments or reimbursementsassistance
109 shall be: (i) made timely at the end within 90 days after the
110 beginning of the academic period of each academic quarter or
111 semester for all tuition reimbursementsassistance payments
112 depending on the availability of funding, and shall be; (ii)
Page 4

depending on the availability of funding, and shall be; (ii)
HB233 Enrolled
113 made on the basis of certified invoicesinstitutional roster or
114 other documentation approved by the Alabama Commission on
115 Higher Education verifying enrollment, eligibility, and
116 allowable charges for each participating member submitted by
117 the institution to the Alabama Commission on Higher
118 Education,; and shall be(iii) supported by names of the
119 students receiving the benefitsassistance, together with the
120 amounts claimed for each student. The tuition
121 reimbursementassistance authorized under this article may be
122 used for undergraduate or graduate studies.
123 (2) In no event shall payments of thetoward tuition and
124 fees, reimbursementancillary costs, or educational expenses
125 under the Alabama National Guard Educational Assistance
126 Program amount to more than 100 percent of qualified tuition
127 and feesthe median cost of tuition per term of all public
128 four-year institutions of higher education in this state as
129 reported to the Alabama Commission on Higher Education. An
130 undergraduate student that qualifies for the Academic
131 Excellence Benefit shall receive an amount equivalent to 100
132 percent of qualified tuition and fees. Undergraduate students
133 with this benefit may use these funds for tuition and fee
134 reimbursement or ancillary costs.
135 (3) No guardactive member shall be eligible for tuition
136 reimbursement or academic excellence benefitsand fees,
137 educational expenses, or ancillary cost assistance for more
138 than 12 years after the date of the first tuition payment to
139 him or herthe active member under this article.
140 (4) In the event thatIf requests for tuition
Page 5

(4) In the event thatIf requests for tuition
HB233 Enrolled
141 reimbursementsassistance provided for in this article from the
142 institutions for educational benefits in any fiscal year
143 exceed the appropriated amount, then the
144 reimbursementspayments shall be prorated equally among the
145 institutions on a percentage basis of the total
146 invoicescertified institutional rosters received by the
147 Alabama Commission on Higher Education and paid accordingly.
148 The reimbursementassistance payments shall be made promptly at
149 the end of each academic quarter or semesterupon receipt for
150 all certified invoicesinstitutional rosters or other
151 documentation approved by the Alabama Commission on Higher
152 Education.
153 (e)(1) The assistance under this article shall be
154 claimed for no more than a total of 120 academic hours or
155 until receipt of the first bachelor's degree, whichever occurs
156 first. The 120 academic hours shall not include more than 72
157 academic hours earned at a community college.
158 (2) An active member who has already obtained a
159 bachelor's degree is not eligible to receive assistance from
160 this program leading to a second bachelor's degree.
161 (3) If the benefits were not used by an active member
162 for a bachelor's degree, the program benefits for graduate
163 students under this article shall be claimed for no more than
164 a total of 60 academic hours or until the receipt of the first
165 graduate degree.
166 (4) An active member who has already obtained a
167 graduate degree is not eligible to receive assistance from
168 this program leading to a second graduate degree.
Page 6

this program leading to a second graduate degree.
HB233 Enrolled
169 (f) To the extent permitted by law, the assistance
170 provided for under this article shall be applied in a
171 last-dollar manner to maximize all of the active member's
172 educational benefits to include educational expenses and
173 ancillary costs.
174 (g) No public institution of higher education in the
175 state may impose a nonresident tuition rate or differential
176 out-of-state resident fee on an active member in good standing
177 who meets the requirements of Section 31-10-4."
178 "§31-10-4
179 (a) In order to be eligible to receive tuition
180 reimbursementassistance under this article, the memberstudent
181 must meet the following minimum requirements:
182 (1) Be an active member of the Alabama National Guard
183 and must have completed basic training.;
184 (2) Be 17 years of age or older;
185 (2)(3) The member must beBe a member in good standing
186 with the Alabama National Guard as prescribed by regulations
187 promulgated by the Department of the Army, and the Department
188 of the Air Force, and by rules adopted by the Military
189 Department of the State of Alabama, at the time of application
190 and during the entirebefore the beginning of the course,
191 training, semester, or quarter for which benefits are
192 received.;
193 (4) Comply with the standards of Satisfactory Academic
194 Progress as required for Title IV benefits under the Higher
195 Education Act and as defined by that educational institution,
196 and maintain a 2.0 grade point average or the letter grade
Page 7

and maintain a 2.0 grade point average or the letter grade
HB233 Enrolled
197 equivalent. Students who are no longer eligible to receive
198 Title IV benefits due to a failure to meet Satisfactory
199 Academic Progress standards shall no longer be eligible to
200 receive benefits under this section until the student
201 sufficiently improves to meet the required standards;
202 (5) Complete a Free Application for Federal Student
203 Aid. This requirement is not applicable for any high school
204 students dually or concurrently enrolled in high school and an
205 institution of higher education; and
206 (6) Sign a promissory note or similar document with
207 provisions for the collection and repayment of assistance in
208 the event that the member is disqualified or otherwise becomes
209 ineligible to continue to receive benefits pursuant to this
210 article.
211 (3)(b) In the event the individual's service in the
212 Alabama National Guard is terminated or his or her service
213 becomes unsatisfactory while receiving assistance or for four
214 years after receiving the benefitsassistance afforded by this
215 program, the benefits willassistance shall be terminated and
216 repaid by the individual on a pro rata basis. After
217 termination for the above causes, or after an individual will
218 be ineligible for any further benefits under this article. If
219 for any reason an individual is dismissed from any school for
220 academic or disciplinary reasons, he isthe individual shall be
221 ineligible for further benefitsassistance from this program.
222 TheWith consultation of the Alabama National Guard Education
223 Services Officer and the Adjutant General of the State of
224 Alabama, the Alabama Commission on Higher Education shall be
Page 8

Alabama, the Alabama Commission on Higher Education shall be
HB233 Enrolled
225 the final authority for making such determinations.
226 (c) Any member who is disqualified from serving in the
227 Alabama National Guard due solely to medical reasons with a
228 Veterans Administration disability rating of 40 percent or
229 greater shall be exempt from repaying any assistance received
230 under this section.
231 (4)(d) The Alabama Commission on Higher Education of
232 the State of Alabama in collaboration with the State Military
233 Department shall adopt rules be responsible for the
234 promulgation of rules and regulations for the administration
235 and implementation ofto administer, advise, and implement this
236 article. The Adjutant General shall be the final authority in
237 determining including rules and regulations providing for the
238 selection of personsindividuals to receive benefitsassistance
239 under this article. The Alabama Commission on Higher Education
240 of the State of Alabama shall be the final authority in
241 determining eligible applicantsexpenses to which assistance
242 may be applied.
243 (5) The Adjutant General of the State of Alabama shall
244 serve as an advisor to the Alabama Commission on Higher
245 Education for the purpose of determining the eligibility of
246 members of the Alabama National Guard to receive benefits
247 under this article.
248 (e) Any member receiving academic excellence assistance
249 prior to August 1, 2026, shall continue to receive the same
250 amount of assistance until he or she completes the course or
251 workforce development program.
252 (f)(1) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
Page 9

(f)(1) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
HB233 Enrolled
253 unencumbered monies contributed to or deposited in the fund
254 from any source, except appropriations from other state funds,
255 shall remain in the fund.
256 (2) The Alabama Commission on Higher Education may
257 adopt rules to use monies retained in the fund pursuant to
258 subdivision (1) to disburse assistance earlier in the academic
259 term than required under Section 31-10-3(d)."
260 Section 2. Section 31-10-4.1, Code of Alabama 1975,
261 providing qualifications for tuition reimbursement under the
262 National Guard Educational Assistance Program, is repealed.
263 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
264 1, 2026.
Page 10

1, 2026.
HB233 Enrolled
265
266
267
268
269
270
271
272
273 ________________________________________________
274 Speaker of the House of Representatives
275
276
277
278 ________________________________________________
279 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
280
281
282 House of Representatives
283
284 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
285 was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.
286
287 John Treadwell
288 Clerk
289
290
291
292
293
294 Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed
295
296
297
Page 11